Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 33.5. Cooperative Housing Corporations - Housing for Members

38-33.5-101.
Method of formation - purpose.

Cooperative housing corporations may be formed by any three or more adult residents of this state associating themselves to form a cooperative or nonprofit corporation, pursuant to article 55, 56, or 58 of title 7, C.R.S., or the “Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act”, articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S. The specified purpose of the entity must be to provide each stockholder in or member of the entity with the right to occupy, for dwelling purposes, a house or an apartment in a building owned or leased by the entity.

History.

Source:
L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 704, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 764, § 38, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended,(SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 820, § 5, effective April 2, 2012.

38-33.5-102.
Requirements for articles of incorporation of cooperative housing corporations.

In addition to any other requirements for articles of incorporation imposed by the “Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act”, articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., such articles of incorporation shall, in the case of cooperative housing corporations, include the following provisions:

That the corporation shall have only one class of stock outstanding;

That each stockholder is entitled, solely by reason of his ownership of stock in the corporation, to occupy, for dwelling purposes, a house or an apartment in a building owned or leased by the corporation;

That the interest of each stockholder in the corporation shall be inseparable from and appurtenant to the right of occupancy, and shall be deemed an estate in real property for all purposes, and shall not be deemed personal property;

That no stockholder is entitled to receive any distribution not out of earnings and profits of the corporation except on a complete or partial liquidation of the corporation.

History.

Source:
L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 704, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

IP(1) amended, p. 764, § 39, effective July 1, 1998.

38-33.5-103.
Provisions relating to taxes, interest, and depreciation on corporate property.

The bylaws of a cooperative housing corporation shall provide that no less than eighty percent of the gross income of the corporation in any taxable year shall be derived from payments from tenant-stockholders. For the purposes of this article, “tenant-stockholder” means an individual who is a stockholder in the corporation and whose stock is fully paid when measured by his proportionate share of the value of the corporation’s equity in the property.

The bylaws shall further provide that each tenant-stockholder shall be credited with his proportionate payment of real estate taxes paid or incurred in any year on the buildings and other improvements owned or leased by the corporation in which the tenant-stockholder’s living quarters are located, together with the land to which such improvements are appurtenant, and likewise with respect to interest paid or incurred by the corporation as well as depreciation on real and personal property which are proper deductions related to the said lands and improvements thereon for purposes of state and federal income taxation.

History.

Source:
L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 705, § 1, effective July 1.

38-33.5-104.
Financing of cooperative housing - stock certificates held by tenant-stockholders.

Stock certificates or membership certificates issued by cooperative housing corporations to tenant-stockholders shall be valid securities for investment by savings and loan associations, when the conditions imposed by section 11-41-119 13, C.R.S., are met.

History.

Source:
L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 705, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 629, § 39, effective August 4.

38-33.5-105.
Provisions to be included in proprietary lease or right of tenancy issued by corporation.

Every stockholder of a cooperative housing corporation shall be entitled to receive from the corporation a proprietary lease or right of tenancy document which shall include the following provisions:

That no sublease in excess of one year, amendment, or modification to such proprietary lease or right of tenancy in the property shall be permitted or created without the lender’s prior written consent; and

That the security for a loan against the tenant-stockholder’s interest shall be in the nature of a real property security interest, and any default of such loan shall entitle the lender to treat such default in the same manner as a default of a loan secured by real property.

History.

Source:
L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 705, § 1, effective July 1.

38-33.5-106.
Exemption from securities laws.

Any stock certificate or other evidence of membership issued by a cooperative housing corporation as an investment in its stock or capital to tenant-stockholders of such corporation is exempt from securities laws contained in article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 80:

Entire article added, p. 705, § 1, effective July 1.